local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="Dejan__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    


    <pardef n="Brank/o__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    


    <pardef n="Marij/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="Marija"><i>Marij</i><par n="Marij/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Labina"><i>Labin</i><par n="Marij/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Branko"><i>Brank</i><par n="Brank/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dejan"><i>Dejan</i><par n="Dejan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Slobodan"><i>Slobodan</i><par n="Dejan__np"/></e>
